02_Morphology/Hindi/hindi1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%> ! Morpheme boundary

%<n%> ! Noun
%<adj%> !adjective suffix

%<cmp%>                 ! Composition 

%>                      ! Morpheme boundary
%+                      ! Compound boundary (lexical form)
%#                      ! Compound boundary (surface form)


LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N
%<n%>: SUFF_CASE ;

LEXICON N1
%<n%>: PREF_CASE ;

LEXICON Cmp
%<cmp%>%+:%# Nouns;

LEXICON C
%<n%>:%> Cmp ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON SUFF_CASE
%<adj%>:%>वान #; ! "suffix- (-full)"
# ;

LEXICON PREF_CASE
%<n1%>:%>अति ! fix
# ;

LEXICON Nouns

धन:धन N ; ! "Money"
बल:बल N ; ! "Power"
गुण:गुण N ;  ! "skill"
ज्ञान:ज्ञान N ; ! "knowledge"


राज:राज C ; ! "Rule"
महल:महल C ;  ! "Palace"
जन:जन C; ! "Public"
धन:धन C; ! "Money"
